Kentucky statutes. TITLE III Executive Branch
Functions; Assistance by Other Agencies

15.255.
Powers, duties, and functions of the Department of Law.

The Department of Law shall have the following powers, duties and functions:

To prevent or remedy damage to the environment caused by any person, group, partnership, association, body corporate or politic, or any agency, department, board, commission, division, or authority, whether state or federal, or by commencing or intervening in any suit or action in state or federal courts, whether civil or criminal, to enforce any statute, ordinance, bylaw, or regulation, or to secure any common-law right or remedy;

To counsel state agencies and commissions given the responsibility over environmental concerns including but not limited to the Energy and Environment Cabinet and the Public Service Commission;

To exercise the common-law powers of the Attorney General in protecting the environment;

To bring public nuisance and other actions in Circuit Courts in the name of the Commonwealth upon complaint by private citizens, when in the opinion of the Attorney General the activity or activities complained of may have a substantial impact upon the environment of the Commonwealth; and

To develop guidelines related to the proper investigation of sexual misconduct by professionals which may be adopted by professional licensure boards.

Nothing in this section shall be interpreted to derogate from any existing common-law or statutory right or remedy against damage to the environment.

History.

Enact. Acts 1978, ch. 155, § 11, effective June 17, 1978; 1986, ch. 331, § 9, effective July 15, 1986; 1986, ch. 406, § 2, effective July 15, 1986; 1994, ch. 265, § 19, effective July 15, 1994; 1994, ch. 470, § 17, effective July 15, 1994; 2005, ch. 123, § 9, effective June 20, 2005; 2010, ch. 24, § 14, effective July 15, 2010.

Legislative Research Commission Notes.

(7/15/94). This statute was amended by 1994 Ky. Acts chs. 265 and 470, which were companion bills and are substantively identical. These Acts have been codified together. For the few minor variations between the Acts, Acts ch. 470 prevails under KRS

446.250

, as the Act which passed the General Assembly last.

15.257.
Requirements for distribution of explanatory materials — Open Records and Open Meetings laws — Retention and management of public records.

The Office of the Attorney General shall, within ninety (90) days of June 20, 2005, and thereafter, within ninety (90) days of the effective date of any legislation amending the provisions of the Open Meetings Act or the Open Records Act, distribute to all county judge/executives, mayors, county attorneys, city attorneys, superintendents of public school districts, presidents of each of the state public postsecondary education institutions identified in KRS 161.220(4)(b) or 164.001(13) or (17), and attorneys of public school districts and public postsecondary education institutions throughout Kentucky written information prepared by the Office of the Attorney General that explains the procedural and substantive provisions of the Open Meetings Act, KRS

61.805

to

61.850

, and the Open Records Act, KRS

61.870

to

61.884

, together with the information required by KRS

171.223

to be prepared by the Department for Libraries and Archives concerning proper retention and management of public records. This distribution may be by electronic means.

All superintendents of public school districts and the presidents of each of the state public postsecondary education institutions identified in KRS 161.220(4)(b) or 164.001(13) or (17) shall be responsible for designating and submitting the names and addresses of the attorneys to whom this information shall be disseminated to the Office of the Attorney General.

History.

Enact. Acts 2005, ch. 45, § 1, effective June 20, 2005; 2008, ch. 113, § 1, effective July 15, 2008.

15.260.
Other departments and agencies to give assistance.

The Department of Law is hereby authorized to call upon any other state department, agency, commission, authority or institution, for whatever help or assistance said department deems necessary to investigate and prosecute cases involving environmental damage, and such other departments, agencies, commissions, authorities, and institutions are hereby required to forthwith cooperate with and assist said department without charge.

History.

Enact. Acts 1978, ch. 155, § 12, effective June 17, 1978; 1986, ch. 406, § 3, effective July 15, 1986.